South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3087.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 20-3-10(3) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (3) physical cruelty toward the petitioning party or a minor child of the petitioning party; SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----